Utah statutes.
17-53-227.    Breach of duty by county legislative body member -- Penalty.

A member of a county legislative body who, without just cause, refuses or neglects to perform a duty imposed upon the member or willfully violates any law governing the member as a member of the county legislative body, or who, as a county legislative body member, willfully, fraudulently, or corruptly attempts to perform an act unauthorized by law shall, in addition to the penalty provided in the criminal code:

(1)  forfeit to the county $500 for every such act, to be recovered on the member's official bond; and

(2)  be further liable on the member's official bond to any person injured by the act for all damages sustained.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

